Florida, session 2026, SB146.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âArtificial intelligence study.â 13 (1)âAs used in this act, the term: 14 (a)ââArtificial intelligenceâ means any of the following: 15 1.âAn artificial system that performs tasks under varying 16 and unpredictable circumstances without significant human 17 oversight or that can learn from experience and improve 18 performance when exposed to data sets. 19 2.âAn artificial system developed in computer software, 20 physical hardware, or other context that solves tasks requiring 21 human-like perception, cognition, planning, learning, 22 communication, or physical action. 23 3.âAn artificial system designed to think or act like a 24 human, including cognitive architectures and neural networks. 25 4.âA set of techniques, including machine learning, 26 designed to approximate a cognitive task. 27 5.âAn artificial system designed to act rationally, 28 including an intelligent software agent or embodied robot that 29 achieves goals using perception, planning, reasoning, learning, 30 communication, decisionmaking, and acting. 31 (b)ââState agencyâ means any separate agency or unit of 32 state government created or established by law and includes, but 33 is not limited to, an authority, a board, a branch, a bureau, a 34 commission, a department, a division, an institution, an office, 35 an officer, or a public corporation. 36 (2)âThe Florida Digital Service shall conduct a study that 37 addresses the impact of state agencies procuring, implementing, 38 or operating artificial intelligence-powered technology. The 39 study must include, but need not be limited to, all of the 40 following: 41 (a)âA list of state agencies that use artificial 42 intelligence. 43 (b)âThe purposes for each state agencyâs use of artificial 44 intelligence. 45 (c)âThe cost for each agency to procure, implement, and 46 operate artificial intelligence-powered technology. 47 (3)âNo later than March 1, 2027, the Florida Digital 48 Service shall submit a written report to the Governor, the 49 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 50 Representatives which contains the results of the study 51 performed pursuant to subsection (2). 52 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.